Utah statutes.
35A-1-303.   Rulemaking.

(1) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall make rules governing adjudicative procedures including the forms of notices and the manner of serving notice in all claims.

(b)  Except as provided in this title and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the rules made under this section are not required to conform to common law or statutory rules of evidence or other technical rules of procedure.

(2)  The rules made under this section shall include procedures to dispose of cases informally, or to expedite claims adjudication, narrow issues, and simplify the methods of proof at hearings.

(3)  Any rule made concerning proceedings before the Workforce Appeals Board shall be made in consultation with the Workforce Appeals Board.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

